Massachusetts, session 194th, S400.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking section 4
and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 4. (a) There shall be a commission to study and make recommendations for
adequately and equitably funding PreK-12 public education in the Commonwealth so that all
children may receive a high quality education that prepares them to lead full, productive lives.
The scope of the study shall include all aspects of the school funding formula as well as other
funding streams for PreK-12 public schools. The study shall include, but not be limited to, the
following areas: (i) all components of the foundation budget created pursuant to section 3 of
chapter 70 and subsequent changes made to the foundation budget by law; (ii) whether the cap
on the foundation inflation index should be removed; (iii) how to appropriately account for and
fund the level and acuity of need for special education services; (iv) how to appropriately
account for and fund the cost of transporting various types of students; (v) how to best address
of 3

the impact of low and declining enrollment on districts; (vi) how to best address the unique
challenges faced by rural districts; (vii) the impact of the fixed 59 percent local share of the
statewide foundation budget on the calculation of combined effort yield for each municipality
and whether the local share should be changed; (viii) the extent to which the wealth and income
measures in the formula accurately determine a municipality's ability to contribute to its
foundation budget costs and whether these measures should be changed; (ix) the impact of the
growing number of municipalities that are subject to the 82.5 percent maximum local
contribution and whether this cap should be removed or changed; (x) the impact of section 21C
of chapter 59 of the General Laws on municipalities and their ability to make their required local
contributions; and (xi) any other aspect of the school funding formula or other school funding
streams that the commission deems necessary to fulfill its mandate. The commission shall
consider and recommend ways that resources can be utilized most efficiently and effectively.
(b) The commission shall include: the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on
education, who shall serve as co-chairs; 1 member to be appointed by the president of the senate;
1 member to be appointed by the speaker of the house; 1 member to be appointed by the minority
leader of the senate; 1 member to be appointed by the minority leader of the house; 1 member to
be appointed by the chair of the senate committee on ways and means; 1 member to be appointed
by the chair of the house committee on ways and means; the secretary of education or a
designee; the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or a designee; the
commissioner of revenue or a designee; a representative from the Massachusetts Teachers
Association; a representative from the American Federation of Teachers-Massachusetts; a
representative from the Massachusetts Budget and Policy Center, Inc.; a representative from the
Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators, Inc.; a representative from the
of 3

Massachusetts Business Alliance for Education, Inc.; a representative from the Massachusetts
Taxpayers Foundation, Inc.; a representative from the Massachusetts Association of School
Superintendents, Inc.; a representative from the Massachusetts Association of School Business
Officials, Inc.; a representative from the Massachusetts Municipal Association, Inc.; a
representative from the Massachusetts Association of School Committees, Inc.; a representative
from the Massachusetts Association of Regional Schools, Inc.; and 5 members to be appointed
by the governor who shall have experience in elementary and secondary education finance or
municipal finance, at least two of whom shall reside in rural areas of the commonwealth.
(c) The commission shall solicit public input and hold not less than 5 public hearings in
different geographic areas of the commonwealth; provided that at least 1 hearing shall include an
option for remote participation. The department of elementary and secondary education shall
assist the commission by furnishing staff support, materials, and fiscal analysis as needed.
SECTION 2. Not later than June 30, 2027, the commission shall issue a report with
findings and recommendations, including any legislative or regulatory changes that may be
necessary to implement these recommendations. The report shall be submitted to the clerks of
the house of representatives and senate, the joint committee on education, and the house and
senate committees on ways and means.
SECTION 3. 7009-XXXX For the operation of the commission established under this
act, including, but not limited to, staffing and administrative
expenses........................................................... $250,000
of 3